Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 3 Employees Operating State Motor Vehicles

Cross references.

Motor vehicle accident reparations generally, T. 33, C. 34.

Purchase and use of state motor vehicles, §

50-19-1

et seq.

45-9-40 through 45-9-43.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 347, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1296, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 256, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 310, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 915, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 307, § 1; Code 1981, § 45-9-40.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1717, § 5; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 245, § 4, effective July 1, 2008.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 245, § 4 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2008.